District of Columbia statutes.
4-211.05

Authorization of payment for moving costs.

The payment may be authorized:

(1)

As a money payment to the recipient when he or she makes his or her own arrangements for moving; or

(2)

As a vendor payment to the moving firm when arrangements must be made by the Mayor.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1105, 29 DCR 1060

History

1981 Ed., § 3-211.5.

Prior Codifications